src/fst/phonology.twolc
!! # Komi Zyrian twol file

!! This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-kpv/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 

!! cf. kpv-phon-old.xfscript
!! cf. [Rueter 2000](http://www.ling.helsinki.fi/~rueter/Publications/Rueter_in-Permistika-6_2000-154-158.pdf)
!! Хельсинкиса университетын кыв туялысь Ижкарын Перымса кывъяс симпозиум вылын лыддьӧмтор

!! ## Alphabet, Sets and Definitions

Alphabet

!! ### Letters of the alphabet

а б в г д е ё ж з и і й к л м н о ӧ п р с т у ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я !!= * @CODE@
А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И І Й К Л М Н О Ӧ П Р С Т У Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я !!= * @CODE@
%^к2:к %^л2:л %^м2:м %^т2:т %^ь2:ь !!= * @CODE@
!%^К2 %^Л2 %^М2 %^Т2 %^Ь2 
%^И2:и !!= * @CODE@
%{иі%}:и	!!= * @CODE@ for soft and hard
%{иі%}:і	!!= * @CODE@ for soft and hard
%{ая%}:а	!!= * @CODE@ for soft and hard
!%{ая%}:я	
%^V1:ӧ       !!= * @CODE@ for reduplicated vowel
%^V1:а %^V1:э %^V1:о %^V1:у !!= * @CODE@

!! ### Triggers
%^Close:0	!!= * @CODE@ Close syllable, this triggers final consonant drop, seen in word-final position and before consonant
%^C2V:0       !!= * @CODE@ Consonant v to vowel

!! ### Boundary symbols

 %> !!= * @CODE@ morpheme boundary мун%>ны
 #  !!  * hash # word boundary
 %- !!= * @CODE@
 «  !!= * @CODE@ мед«ічӧт
 »  !!= * @CODE@  удж»ал»ышт

! Literal quotes and angles must be escaped (cf morpheme boundaries further down):
 »7     ! »
 «7     ! «
 %[%>%] ! >
 %[%<%] ! <

!! Diacritics
%^Inf:0  %^PATR:0 %^FEM:0


 ;


!! ### Sets

Sets
!! Vowel
Vow =  а е ё и і о ӧ у ы э ю я !!= * @CODE@
       А Е Ё И У О Ӧ У Ы Э Ю Я ; !!= * @CODE@

!! Palatal Vowel
!! Cns-initial vowels
PalVow = е ё ю я !!= * @CODE@
         Е Ё Ю Я ; !!= * @CODE@

!! All non-vowels, consonants and hard and soft signs
Cns =  б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ь !!= * @CODE@
       Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ь !!= * @CODE@
       к2 л2 м2 т2 ь2 ; !!= * @CODE@
!  К2 Л2 М2 Т2 Ь2

!! All non-vowels with exception of soft sign
CnsNotSoft =  б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ъ !!= * @CODE@
              Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ !!= * @CODE@
       	      к2 л2 м2 т2 ь2 ; !!= * @CODE@
!   К2 Л2 М2 Т2 Ь2
!! All consonants followed by Cyrillic и
CnsBeforeCyri = б в г ж й к м п р ф х ч ш щ !!= * @CODE@
              	Б В Г Ж Й К М П Р Ф Х Ч Ш Щ !!= * @CODE@
              	к2 м2 т2 ; !!= * @CODE@
! К2 М2 Т2
! Why is т2 here 2015-10-01

!! All but z consonants that can be followed by either і or и
PairedCnsNoZ =  д л н с т !!= * @CODE@
                Д Л Н С Т !!= * @CODE@
       	        л2 т2 ; !!= * @CODE@

!! Letters
 Letter = Vow Cns ; !!= * @CODE@

!! Dummy
Dummy =  %^Inf %^PATR %^FEM ; !!= * @CODE@


!! ### Definitions

!! No definitions


!! ## Rules

Rules

!! ### Rules connected to L/V alternations 

"The famous L/V"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@** changes л to в betweeen vowel and the ^Close symbol
 л:в <=>  Vow _ %^Close: ;
! Vow _ [# | %> Cns ] ;


"The famous L/V goes Izhva"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@** where л goes to its preceeding vowel (except a) before ^C2V.
 л:Vy <=>  [Cns: |Vow: | # | %- ] Vx: _ %^C2V: ;
	where Vx in (а е ё и о ӧ у ы э ю я)
          Vy in (о э о и о ӧ у ы э у о)
        matched ;

"Vowel lengthening а:о я:ё"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@** for the ^C2V context
 Vx:Vy <=> [Cns: | # | %- ] _ л: %^C2V: ;
        where Vx in (а я)
              Vy in (о ё)
        matched ;


"The ӧ/V as in унаан"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
 %^V1:Vy <=>  [Cns: |Vow: | # | %- ] Vx: %> _  ;
	where Vx in (а е ё и о ӧ у ы э ю я)
              Vy in (а э о и о ӧ у ы э у а)
        matched ;
!!€ уна%>%^V1н
!!€ уна%>ан

!! ### Rules for paragogic consonants

"Paragogic consonant deletion"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
 Cx:0 <=> Cns _ %^Close: ;
       where Cx in (к м) ;

"Paragogic т deletion and tripple т"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@** between Cns and ^Close
 т:0 <=> Cns _ %^Close: ;
! т:0 <=> п _ [ # | %> Cns ] ;
 !!€ зепт%>ыс
 !!€ зепт%>ыс
 !!€ зепт%^Close#
 !!€ зеп00#
 !!€ зепт%^Close%>сӧ
 !!€ зеп00%>сӧ
 т _ %> т ;       
!!€ Блатт%>тӧг
!!€ Блат0%>тӧг


!! ### Other consonant deletion rules

!"mDeletion"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
! м:0 <=>
! н _ [ # | %> Cns ] ;
 !!€ синм%>ыс
 !!€ синм%>ыс
 !!€ синм#
 !!€ син0#
 !!€ синм%>сӧ
 !!€ син0%>сӧ


!"kDeletion"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
! к:0 <=> [ с | ш | с ь | с ь2: | ч ] _ [ # | %> Cns ]  ;
 !!€ воск%>ыс
 !!€ воск%>ыс
 !!€ воск%^Close#
 !!€ вос00#
 !!€ воск%^Close%>сӧ
 !!€ вос00%>сӧ
 !!€ кось2к%^Close%>сянь
 !!€ кось00%>сянь

"jDeletion after vowel"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
 й:0 <=>  [б | в | г | д | ж | з | к | м | н | п | р | т | с ] _  %^Close:  ;
! [б | в | г | д | ж | з | к | м | н | п | р | т | с ] _ [ # | %> Cns ] ;
 !!€ гобй%^Close%>ыс
 !!€ гобй0%>ыс
 !!€ гобй%^Close#
 !!€ гоб00#
 !!€ гобй%^Close%>сӧ
 !!€ гоб00%>сӧ
 !!€ кывй%^Close%>ыс
 !!€ кывй0%>ыс
 !!€ кывй%^Close#
 !!€ кыв00#
 !!€ кывй%^Close%>сӧ
 !!€ кыв00%>сӧ
   Vow _ %>  [%{ая%}: | э: ] ;
!   Vow _ %> [ %{ая%}: | %{иі%}: ] ;
 !!€ вый%>%{ая%}#
 !!€ вы0%>я#
 !!€ сёй%>%{ая%}#
 !!€ сё0%>я#
 !!$ сёй%>%{иі%}#
 !!$ сё0%>и#
 !!€ сёй%>%{иі%}#
 !!€ сёй%>и#

"j to hard sign after consonant"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
 й:ъ <=> [б | в | г | д | ж | з | к | м | н | п | р | т | с ] _ %> %{ая%}: ;
!!€ кывй%>%{ая%}#
!!€ кывъ%>я#
!!€ кӧсй%>%{ая%}#
!!€ кӧсъ%>я#

"l deletion ALSO tripple letter"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
 л:0 <=>   л _  ь  %^Close: ;
!  л _  ь  [ # | %> Cns ] ;
 !!€ вакулль%>ыс
 !!€ вакулль%>ыс
 !!€ вакулль%^Close#
 !!€ вакул0ь#
 !!€ вакулль%^Close%>сӧ
 !!€ вакул0ь%>сӧ
 !!€ вакулль%^Close%>ъяс
 !!€ вакул0ь0%>0яс
 л _ %>	л ;
!!€ металл%>лӧн
!!€ метал0%>лӧн


"d deletion"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
 д:0 <=> д _ [ ь | з ]  %^Close: ;
! д _ [ ь | з ]  [ # | %> Cns ] ;
 !!€ виддз%^Close%>ыс
 !!€ виддз0%>ыс
 !!€ виддз%^Close#
 !!€ вид0з0#
 !!€ виддз%^Close%>сӧ
 !!€ вид0з0%>сӧ

!! ### Vowel Palatalisation rules

"а 2 я, о 2 ё, у 2 ю"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
 Vx:Vy <=> [~[ д з | ч ]] [ ь: | й: ]  (%^Close:) %>  _ [ # | %> | %- | Cns: | Vow: | %{ая%}:] ;
        where Vx in (%{ая%} а о у)
              Vy in (я      я ё ю)
        matched ;
!!€ вой%>%{ая%}с
!!€ во0%>яс
!!€ озй%>%{ая%}с
!!€ озъ%>яс
!!€ ворссь%>%{ая%}#
!!€ ворсс0%>я#
!! картопель+Sg+Ine+PxSg3
!!€ картопель%>%{ая%}с
!!€ картопел0%>яс
!! картопель+Pl+Nom
!!€ картопель%>ъяс
!!€ картопель%>0яс
! Have to look for ь>о:ё,
! ь>у:ю appears in compound words

"%{иі%} 2 і"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
 %{иі%}:і <=>
 [PairedCnsNoZ | [Vow |[Cns - д]] з ] (%^Close:) %>  _ [ # | %> | %- | Cns: | Vow: ] ;
! [PairedCnsNoZ |  з ] %>  _ [ # | %> | Cns: | Vow: ] ;
!   except
!    д з %>  _ [ # | %> | Cns: | Vow: ] ;

"%{иі%} 2 и"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
 %{иі%}:и <=> [ Vow | CnsBeforeCyri | й: | ь: | д з ] (%^Close:) %>  _ [ # | %> |%- | Cns: | Vow: ] ;
!!€ ворссь%>%{иі%}#
!!€ ворсс0%>и#
!!€ ло%>%{иі%}#
!!€ ло%>и#
!!€ шу%>%{иі%}с
!!€ шу%>ис
!!€ вай%>%{иі%}с
!!€ вай%>ис

!! ### Rules for soft and hard sign

"Soft Sign Deletion"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
 ь:0 <=> CnsNotSoft _ %> [ а: |%{ая%}:| о: | у: | і: | %{иі%}: | э:] ;
 ! CnsNotSoft _ %> [ а: |%{ая%}:| о: | у: | і: | ъ: | %{иі%}: ] ; 2017-03-27
        с _  %> с [ ь | я ] ;

! Testcases: see VowelPalatalisation above
! Also orthography _Коми орфография кывкуд 2008: 9_
! %^ь2, %^Ь2 will be used to mark special instances of _ь_ retension
!!€ велӧдысь%>сянь
!!€ велӧдыс0%>сянь
!!€ велӧдысь%>сьыс
!!€ велӧдыс0%>сьыс
!!$ гос0%>сянь
!!$ госъ%>сянь
!!€ пас%>сянь
!!€ пас%>сянь
!!€ пас%^ь2%>сянь
!!€ пась%>сянь

"Hard Sign Deletion"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
 ъ:0 <=> [ Vow (й) | ь: ] (%^Close:) %> _ ;
!!€ вой%>ъяс
!!€ вой%>0яс
!!€ выль%>ъяс
!!€ выль%>0яс
!!€ коми%>ъяс
!!€ коми%>0яс
!!€ автобус%>ъяс
!!€ автобус%>ъяс
!!$ автобус%>ъяс
!!$ автобус%>0яс
   Vow л: %^C2V: %> _ ;

"Hard Sign Palatalization"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
 ъ:ь <=> [ д: з | ч ] (%^Close:) %> _ я ;
!!€ виддз%^Close%>ъяс
!!€ вид0з0%>ьяс

!! ### Other rules

!! To do: Look at a more logical ordering

"No triple letters"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@** deletes the middle consonant in Cx Cx > Cx sequences
 Cx:0 <=> Cx _ %> Cx ;
         where Cx in (с ) ; ! 
!where Cx in (с т л) ; ! ХХХ %> indicates morphology, at least these three consonants
! where Cx in (а о у б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ) ; !
! Also orthography _Коми орфография кывкуд 2008: 16_
!!€ класс%>сянь
!!€ клас0%>сянь

"IClitic"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
 И2:й <=> Vow %- _ #  ;

"Dialect э for ӧ in э:е"
 э:е <=> [CnsBeforeCyri | й: | ь:] %> (%-) _ ;
!! клуб+N+Sg+Err/Dial+Ill **club/kerho**
!!€ клуб%>э
!!€ клуб%>еx
     д з %> _ ;

"Disallow l to vowel after other than l"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
%^C2V:0 /<=
     [Cns - л:|Vows ] _ %>  ;
